Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1589.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 811. School Library Collections.--(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school shall maintain a library collection that includes a variety of print, nonprint and electronic resources with required technology and related equipment of sufficient quality and quantity to support and supplement the educational needs of students, including a minimum print collection of five thousand (5,000) items per school or no less than ten (10) books per student plus access to 12345678910111213141516171819 State-funded e-resources, including the POWER library.(b) A certified school librarian shall:(1) Direct the development and implementation of a library of a public school according to the department's guidelines for school library programs.(2) Instruct students and staff in the use of the library collection and the library curriculum standards adopted by the department.(3) Assess the library and the library's instructional programs to meet the needs of the students and the school's curriculum.(c) The department shall promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified school librarian." An individual who is a certified teacher and has:(1) completed a school library certification at an institution of higher education; or(2) achieved a minimum score required on the Praxis II School Librarian test to be employed as a school librarian in this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Library." A central space within a school building that is staffed by a certified school librarian and accessible to all students and staff throughout the school day that has appropriate furnishing to house and circulate the library collection and provides space for student learning and 20250HB1589PN1899 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 instruction."Library collection." Collections of information in formats that include books, periodicals, audio and visually enhanced materials, computer and digital resources and applications and shared information resources through networks or the Internet. The term does not include books classified as textbooks, except when used in limited numbers as reference books or books housed in classrooms."Public school." A school operated by a school district, intermediate unit or charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1589PN1899 - 3 - 1234567891011